Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8586.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24-12-37 of the General Laws in Chapter 24-12 entitled "Rhode
Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority" is hereby amended to read as follows:
24-12-37. Penalty for nonpayment of toll — Toll violators and toll evaders.
(a) Legislative findings. The general assembly finds as follows:
(1) That all users of any tolled projects should be required to timely pay for the use of such
projects;
(2) That toll violators and toll evaders unfairly shift the financial burden of maintaining the
tolled projects to other project users; and
(3) Rhode Island has a strong interest in ensuring that its transportation infrastructure is
adequately funded in a fair and equitable manner.
(b) In each instance when a person fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll on a
tolled project, and is issued a violation for the same, the toll violator shall pay the toll amount within
fourteen (14) days of issuance of the violation.
(c) Any toll violator who fails to pay the toll amount due within the fourteen-day (14)
period in subsection (b) shall immediately incur a forty-dollar ($40.00) administrative fee in
addition to the unpaid toll amount.
(d) Any toll violator who fails to pay the administrative fee and unpaid toll as required by
subsection (c) within forty-five (45) days of the issuance of the original violation, shall incur a
thirty five-dollar ($35.00) administrative fee in addition to the forty dollar ($40.00) administrative

fee and the unpaid toll amount. The toll amount and administrative fees shall be paid to the
authority.
(e) Toll evaders shall be responsible for any tolls and administrative fees applicable to toll
violators. Further, at the request of the authority, any toll evader shall also promptly receive a traffic
violation summons that shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Rhode Island traffic tribunal,
which may suspend the toll evader’s driver’s license for up to six (6) months for the violations and
assess a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500), or both. All tolls, administrative fees, and fines
shall be payable to the authority.
(f) If any unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are not paid within ninety (90)
days of the issuance of the original violation, and the toll violator has incurred at least ten (10)
instances in which such toll violator has failed to pay any required toll amounts, administrative
fees, and fines, then the authority may report the person as a toll violator, or, if appropriate, as a
toll evader, to the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles, who then shall not permit that person
to renew his or her driver’s license and vehicle registration until any unpaid toll amounts,
administrative fees, and fines are paid to the authority. Upon the authority’s receipt of such payment
or a written repayment agreement between the person and the authority, the authority shall promptly
issue a verbal, written, or electric confirmation showing the amounts paid and a certification that
the person does not owe any amounts to the authority or has otherwise made satisfactory repayment
arrangements with the authority. In any such case, the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles shall
forthwith release any hold placed for this purpose on the person’s license renewal and vehicle
registration renewal. If a person who made satisfactory repayment arrangements with the authority
subsequently fails to honor and comply with such arrangements with the authority according to
their terms, the authority may re-report the person to the Rhode Island division of motor vehicles
which shall then prohibit that person from renewing their driver’s license and vehicle registration
until the originally unpaid toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines are paid to the authority. This
provision of this subsection shall not apply to any vehicle owned by a rental company as defined
in §31-34.1-1.
(g) “Toll violator” means, for the purposes of this section, any person who uses any project
and fails to pay or prepay the required toll.
(h) “Toll evader” means, for the purposes of this section, any person who uses a project,
fails or refuses to pay or prepay the required toll, and deliberately circumvents or proceeds around
or through a gate or other barrier on a project; and/or any toll violator who fails or refuses to pay
or prepay the required toll on a tolled project at least twenty (20) or more times, received at least
three (3) written notices from the authority (or its agent) regarding the non-payment of tolls, and is
LC006496/SUB A - Page 2 of 6

not a party to, or in current compliance with, a written repayment plan with the authority.
(i) The authority may promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to ensure the proper
administration of the provisions of this section. Any person aggrieved by the authority’s assessment
of any administrative fees may request review of such assessment through the process established
by the authority, which shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.
(j) For the purposes of this section only, “person” means the registered owner, EZPass
account holder, driver, rentee, or lessee of a motor vehicle. In the case of a motor vehicle owned
by a rental company, "person" means the rentee or lessee of the vehicle at the time of the violation,
provided that the rental company complies with subsections (o) and (p) of this section.
(k) This section shall apply retroactively to all persons who are toll evaders as of the
effective date of this act [October 1, 2016].
(l) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to reduce or otherwise eliminate
any tolls, fines, or penalties a person owes to the authority based upon violations occurring prior to
the effective date of this act [October 1, 2016].
(m) It is unlawful for any person or business, other than an authorized representative of the
authority, or any other duly authorized and existing toll or transportation agency, to sell, lease, rent,
or offer for sale, lease or rent, any tokens, tickets, passes, transponders, or other evidences of
payment issued for passage on any project. Any person or business who or that is found in violation
of this subsection shall be punished, for each offense, by a fine of not more than five hundred
dollars ($500).
(n) If any provision of this section or its application to any person is deemed invalid, any
such invalidity shall not affect the other provisions of this section that may lawfully be given effect
without the invalid provision.
(o) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a rental company, as
defined in § 31-34.1-1, that is the registered owner of a motor vehicle shall be entitled to establish
non-liability for toll violations, administrative fees, and fines by providing to the traffic tribunal a
copy of a written rental or lease agreement which shall be prima facie evidence that the lessee was
the operator of the vehicle.
(p) The issuing authority shall provide to the owner of a rented or leased vehicle a notice,
in writing, of each toll violation in which a motor vehicle owned by the rental or leasing company
is involved, including the license number of the vehicle and the date and time of the toll violation.
Upon receipt of this notice the owner of a rented or leased vehicle shall inform the issuing authority,
within twenty (20) days, to the extent available, the operator’s name, home address, employer,
employer’s address, and local address, if any.
LC006496/SUB A - Page 3 of 6

(q) The renter or lessee shall not be considered an agent of the owner if the owner is
engaged in the business of renting or leasing vehicles.
SECTION 2. Section 31-3-6.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-6.3. Unpaid out-of-state toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines — Denial of
registration — Denial of transfer of registration — Denial of renewal of registration and
licenses.
(a) Upon receipt of a request from another state or other entity with similar tolling authority
with which the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority has entered into an agreement providing
for the reciprocal treatment of out-of-state toll violators to take action against a toll violator, the
Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall conduct an independent review of each toll
violation that forms the basis for such request, which shall include a review of photographic, video,
or other visual evidence, to determine that the requesting state or other entity with similar tolling
authority imposed any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines against the actual registered
owner of the motor vehicle.
(b) As part of its independent review, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall
provide written notice to the registered owner of the motor vehicle in question. The registered
owner shall have ten (10) days from the date on the written notice to contact the Rhode Island
turnpike and bridge authority and to provide information, documentation, and any other evidence
contesting the requested action against the out-of-state toll violator. Thereafter, the Rhode Island
turnpike and bridge authority shall consider all of the information, documentation, and any other
evidence provided as part of its independent review.
(c) If after its independent review the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is
satisfied that any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines are properly imposed against the
actual registered owner of the motor vehicle and the registered owner could be subject to reporting
to the division of motor vehicles pursuant to § 24-12-37 if such toll violations had occurred on
tolled projects in this state, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority may report the registered
owner to the division of motor vehicles.
(d) The division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or registration
upon expiration thereof; register any motor vehicle; or transfer the registration of any motor vehicle
of any person reported to it pursuant to subsection (c) of this section until any toll amounts,
administrative fees, and/or fines owed to the other state or other entity with similar tolling authority
have been paid in full or the person has entered into, and is in current compliance with, a repayment
agreement with respect to any amounts owed. The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall
LC006496/SUB A - Page 4 of 6

provide a copy of any notification received from the other state or other entity with similar tolling
authority regarding full payment of amounts owed or the existence of a repayment agreement to
the division of motor vehicles within five (5) business days of receipt. Within five (5) business days
of receiving such notification, the division of motor vehicles shall renew the person’s license and
renew, transfer, or issue the person’s registration. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to any vehicle owned by a rental company as defined in § 31-34.1-1.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006496/SUB A
========
LC006496/SUB A - Page 5 of 6